Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201944-2401
Purpose of act.

The purpose of the Nebraska Property and Liability Insurance Guaranty Association Act is to provide a method for the payment of certain claims against insolvent insurance companies, as defined in the act, to avoid unnecessary delay in payment of such claims, to avoid financial loss to claimants or to policyholders, to assist in the detection and prevention of insurer insolvencies, and to provide an association of insurers against which the cost of such protection may be assessed in an equitable manner.

Laws 1971, LB 722, § 1;

Laws 2019, LB380, § 1.